District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.73

Application to the District government.

Except as otherwise provided for by District law or when otherwise lawfully and reasonably permitted, it shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice for a District government agency or office to limit or refuse to provide any facility, service, program, or benefit to any individual on the basis of an individual’s actual or perceived: race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, familial status, family responsibilities, disability, matriculation, political affiliation, source of income, or place of residence or business.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, § 273
as added Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-189, § 2(g), 49 DCR 6523
Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-58, § 2(h), 53 DCR 14
D.C. Law 16-58 substituted “sexual orientation, gender identity or expression,” for “sexual orientation,”.